California statutes. Penal Code
(2) That an emergency protective order is necessary to prevent the occurrence or reoccurrence of the stalking activity.

(e) An emergency protective order may include either of the following specific orders as appropriate:

(1) A harassment protective order as described in Section 527.6 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(2) A workplace violence protective order as described in Section 527.8 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(f) An emergency protective order shall be issued without prejudice to any person.

(g) An emergency protective order expires at the earlier of the following times:

(1) The close of judicial business on the fifth court day following the day of its issuance.

(2) The seventh calendar day following the day of its issuance.

(h) A peace officer who requests an emergency protective order shall do all of the following:

(1) Serve the order on the restrained person, if the restrained person can reasonably be located.

(2) Give a copy of the order to the protected person, or, if the protected person is a minor child, to a parent or guardian of the protected child if the parent or guardian can reasonably be located, or to
 a person having temporary custody of the child.

(3) File a copy of the order with the court as soon as practicable after issuance.

(4) Have the order entered into the computer database system for protective and restraining orders maintained by the Department of Justice.

(i) A peace officer shall use every reasonable means to enforce an emergency protective order.

(j) A peace officer who acts in good faith to enforce an emergency protective order is not civilly or criminally liable.

(k) A peace officer described in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 830.32 who requests an emergency protective order pursuant to this section shall also notify the sheriff or police chief of the city in whose
 jurisdiction the peace officer’s college or school is located after issuance of the order.

(l) “Judicial officer,” as used in this section, means a judge, commissioner, or referee.

(m) A person subject to an emergency protective order under this section shall not own, possess, purchase, or receive a firearm while the order is in effect.

(n) Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit a court to issue an emergency protective order prohibiting speech or other activities that are constitutionally protected or protected by the laws of this state or by the United States or activities occurring during a labor dispute, as defined by Section 527.3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, including, but not limited to, picketing and hand billing.

(o) The
 Judicial Council shall develop forms, instructions, and rules for the scheduling of hearings and other procedures established pursuant to this section.

(p) Any intentional disobedience of any emergency protective order granted under this section is punishable pursuant to Section 166. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to prevent punishment under Section 646.9, in lieu of punishment under this section, if a violation of Section 646.9 is also pled and proven.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 559, Sec. 1.   (SB 1154)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

646.91a.

(a) The court shall order that any party enjoined pursuant to Section 646.91 be prohibited from taking any action to obtain the address or location of a protected party or a protected party’s family members, caretakers, or guardian, unless there is good cause not to make that order.

(b) The Judicial Council shall promulgate forms necessary to effectuate this section.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 646.91A by Stats. 2006, Ch. 901, Sec. 6.1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

646.92.

(a) (1) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, county sheriff, or director of the local department of corrections shall give notice not less than 15 days prior to the release from the state prison or a county jail of any person who is convicted of violating Section 646.9 or convicted of a felony offense involving domestic violence, as defined in Section 6211 of the Family Code, or any change in the parole status or relevant change in the parole location of the convicted person, or if the convicted person absconds from supervision while on parole, to any person the court identifies as a victim of the offense, a family member of the victim, or a witness to the offense by telephone, electronic mail, or certified mail
 at his or her last known address, upon request and using the method of communication selected by the requesting party, if that method is available. A victim, family member, or witness shall keep the department or county sheriff informed of his or her current contact information to be entitled to receive notice. A victim may designate another person for the purpose of receiving notification. The department, county sheriff, or director of the local department of corrections, shall make reasonable attempts to locate a person who has requested notification but whose contact information is incorrect or not current. However, the duty to keep the department or county sheriff informed of current contact information shall remain with the victim.

(2) Following notification by the department pursuant to Section 3058.61, in the event the victim had not originally requested notification under this section, the sheriff or the chief of police, as appropriate,
 shall make an attempt to advise the victim or, if the victim is a minor, the parent or guardian of the victim, of the victim’s right to notification under this section.

(b) All information relating to any person who receives notice under this section shall remain confidential and shall not be made available to the person convicted of violating this section.

(c) For purposes of this section, “release” includes a release from the state prison or a county jail because time has been served, a release from the state prison or a county jail to parole or probation supervision, or an escape from an institution or reentry facility.

(d) The department or county sheriff shall give notice of an escape from an institution or reentry facility of any person convicted of violating Section 646.9 or convicted of a felony offense
 involving domestic violence, as defined in Section 6211 of the Family Code, to the notice recipients described in subdivision (a).

(e) Substantial compliance satisfies the notification requirements of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 364, Sec. 1.   (SB 852)   Effective September 29, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

646.93.

(a) (1) In those counties where the arrestee is initially incarcerated in a jail operated by the county sheriff, the sheriff shall designate a telephone number that shall be available to the public to inquire about bail status or to determine if the person arrested has been released and if not yet released, the scheduled release date, if known. This subdivision does not require a county sheriff or jail administrator to establish a new telephone number but shall require that the information contained on the victim
 resource card, as defined in Section 264.2, specify the phone number that a victim should call to obtain this information. This subdivision shall not require the county sheriff or municipal police departments to produce new victim resource cards containing a designated phone number for the public to inquire about the bail or custody status of a person who has been arrested until their existing supply of victim resource cards has been exhausted.

(2) In those counties where the arrestee is initially incarcerated in an incarceration facility other than a jail operated by the county sheriff and in those counties that do not operate a Victim Notification (VNE) system, a telephone number shall be available to the public to inquire about bail status or to determine if the person arrested has been released and if not yet released, the scheduled release date, if known. This subdivision does not require a municipal police agency or jail administrator to
 establish a new telephone number but shall require that the information contained on the victim resource card, as defined in Section 264.2, specify the phone number that a victim should call to obtain this information. This subdivision shall not require the county sheriff or municipal police departments to produce new victim resource cards containing a designated phone number for the public to inquire about the bail or custody status of a person who has been arrested until their existing supply of victim resource cards has been exhausted.

(3) If an arrestee is transferred to another incarceration facility and is no longer in the custody of the initial arresting agency, the transfer date and new incarceration location shall be made available through the telephone number designated by the arresting agency.

(4) The resource card provided to victims pursuant to Section 264.2 shall
 list the designated telephone numbers to which this section refers.

(b) Any request to lower bail shall be heard in open court in accordance with Section 1270.1. In addition, the prosecutor shall make all reasonable efforts to notify the victim or victims of the bail hearing. The victims may be present at the hearing and shall be permitted to address the court on the issue of bail.

(c) Unless good cause is shown not to impose the following conditions, the judge shall impose as additional conditions of release on bail that:

(1) The defendant shall not initiate contact in person, by telephone, or any other means with the alleged victims.

(2) The defendant shall not knowingly go within 100 yards of the alleged victims, their residence, or place of
 employment.

(3) The defendant shall not possess any firearms or other deadly or dangerous weapons.

(4) The defendant shall obey all laws.

(5) The defendant, upon request at the time of his or her appearance in court, shall provide the court with an address where he or she is residing or will reside, a business address and telephone number if employed, and a residence telephone number if the defendant’s residence has a telephone.

A showing by declaration that any of these conditions are violated shall, unless good cause is shown, result in the issuance of a no-bail warrant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 854, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

646.94.

(a) Contingent upon a Budget Act appropriation, the Department of Corrections shall ensure that any parolee convicted of violating Section 646.9 on or after January 1, 2002, who is deemed to pose a high risk of committing a repeat stalking offense be placed on an intensive and specialized parole supervision program for a period not to exceed the period of parole.

(b) (1) The program shall include referral to specialized services, for example substance abuse treatment, for offenders needing those specialized services.

(2) Parolees participating in this program shall be required to participate in relapse prevention classes as a condition of parole.

(3) Parole agents may conduct group counseling sessions as part of the program.

(4) The department may include other appropriate offenders in the treatment program if doing so facilitates the effectiveness of the treatment program.

(c) The program shall be established with the assistance and supervision of the staff of the department primarily by obtaining the services of mental health providers specializing in the treatment of
 stalking patients. Each parolee placed into this program shall be required to participate in clinical counseling programs aimed at reducing the likelihood that the parolee will commit or attempt to commit acts of violence or stalk their victim.

(d) The department may require persons subject to this section to pay some or all of the costs associated with this treatment, subject to the person’s ability to pay. “Ability to pay” means the overall capability of the person to reimburse the costs, or a portion of the costs, of providing mental health treatment, and shall include, but shall not be limited to, consideration of all of the following factors:

(1) Present financial position.

(2) Reasonably discernible future financial position.

(3) Likelihood that
 the person shall be able to obtain employment after the date of parole.

(4) Any other factor or factors that may bear upon the person’s financial capability to reimburse the department for the costs.

(e) For purposes of this section, a mental health provider specializing in the treatment of stalking patients shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1) Be a licensed clinical social worker, as defined in Article 4 (commencing with Section 4996) of Chapter 14 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, a clinical psychologist, as defined in Section 1316.5 of the Health and Safety Code, or a physician and surgeon engaged in the practice of psychiatry.

(2) Have clinical experience in the area of assessment and treatment of stalking
 patients.

(3) Have two letters of reference from professionals who can attest to the applicant’s experience in counseling stalking patients.

(f) The program shall target parolees convicted of violating Section 646.9 who meet the following conditions:

(1) The offender has been subject to a clinical assessment.

(2) A review of the offender’s criminal history indicates that the offender poses a high risk of committing further acts of stalking or acts of violence against his or her victim or other persons upon his or her release on parole.

(3) The parolee, based on his or her clinical assessment, may be amenable to treatment.

(g) On or before January 1, 2006, the Department of Corrections shall evaluate the intensive and specialized parole supervision program and make a report to the Legislature regarding the results of the program, including, but not limited to, the recidivism rate for repeat stalking related offenses committed by persons placed into the program and a cost-benefit analysis of the program.

(h) This section shall become operative upon the appropriation of sufficient funds in the Budget Act to implement this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 159, Sec. 163.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Operation of section is contingent upon funding, as provided in subd. (h).)
-------------------------------------------

647.

Except as provided in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) and in subdivisions (k) and (l), a person who commits any of the following acts is guilty of disorderly conduct, a misdemeanor:

(a) An individual who solicits anyone to engage in or who engages in lewd or dissolute conduct in a public place or in a place open to the public or exposed to public view.

(b) (1) An individual who solicits, or who agrees to engage in, or who engages in, an act of prostitution with the intent to receive compensation, money, or anything of value from another person. An individual agrees to engage in an act of prostitution when, with specific intent to so engage, the individual manifests an acceptance of an offer or
 solicitation by another person to so engage, regardless of whether the offer or solicitation was made by a person who also possessed the specific intent to engage in an act of prostitution.

(2) An individual who solicits, or who agrees to engage in, or who engages in, an act of prostitution with another person who is 18 years of age or older in exchange for the individual providing compensation, money, or anything of value to the other person. An individual agrees to engage in an act of prostitution when, with specific intent to so engage, the individual manifests an acceptance of an offer or solicitation by another person who is 18 years of age or older to so engage, regardless of whether the offer or solicitation was made by a person who also possessed the specific intent to engage in an act of prostitution.

(3) An individual who solicits, or who agrees to engage in, or who
 engages in, an act of prostitution with another person who is a minor in exchange for the individual providing compensation, money, or anything of value to the minor. An individual agrees to engage in an act of prostitution when, with specific intent to so engage, the individual manifests an acceptance of an offer or solicitation by someone who is a minor to so engage, regardless of whether the offer or solicitation was made by a minor who also possessed the specific intent to engage in an act of prostitution.

(4) A manifestation of acceptance of an offer or solicitation to engage in an act of prostitution does not constitute a violation of this subdivision unless some act, in addition to the manifestation of acceptance, is done within this state in furtherance of the commission of the act of prostitution by the person manifesting an acceptance of an offer or solicitation to engage in that act. As used in this subdivision, “prostitution”
 includes any lewd act between persons for money or other consideration.

(5) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, this subdivision does not apply to a child under 18 years of age who is alleged to have engaged in conduct to receive money or other consideration that would, if committed by an adult, violate this subdivision. A commercially exploited child under this paragraph may be adjudged a dependent child of the court pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 300 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and may be taken into temporary custody pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 305 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, if the conditions allowing temporary custody without warrant are met.

(c) Who accosts other persons in a public place or in a place open to the public for the purpose of begging or soliciting alms.

(d) Who loiters in or about a toilet open to the public for the purpose of engaging in or soliciting a lewd or lascivious or an unlawful act.

(e) Who lodges in a building, structure, vehicle, or place, whether public or private, without the permission of the owner or person entitled to the possession or in control of it.

(f) Who is found in a public place under the influence of intoxicating liquor, a drug, controlled substance, toluene, or a combination of an intoxicating liquor, drug, controlled substance, or toluene, in a condition that they are unable to exercise care for their own safety or the safety of others, or by reason of being under the influence of intoxicating liquor, drug, controlled substance, toluene, or a combination of an intoxicating liquor, drug, or toluene, interferes with or obstructs or prevents
 the free use of a street, sidewalk, or other public way.

(g) If a person has violated subdivision (f), a peace officer, if reasonably able to do so, shall place the person, or cause the person to be placed, in civil protective custody. The person shall be taken to a facility, designated pursuant to Section 5170 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, for the 72-hour treatment and evaluation of inebriates. A peace officer may place a person in civil protective custody with that kind and degree of force authorized to effect an arrest for a misdemeanor without a warrant. A person who has been placed in civil protective custody shall not thereafter be subject to criminal prosecution or juvenile court proceeding based on the facts giving rise to this placement. This subdivision does not apply to the following persons:

(1) A person who is under the influence of a drug or under the
 combined influence of intoxicating liquor and a drug.

(2) A person who a peace officer has probable cause to believe has committed a felony, or who has committed a misdemeanor in addition to subdivision (f).

(3) A person who a peace officer in good faith believes will attempt escape or will be unreasonably difficult for medical personnel to control.

(h) Who loiters, prowls, or wanders upon the private property of another, at any time, without visible or lawful business with the owner or occupant. As used in this subdivision, “loiter” means to delay or linger without a lawful purpose for being on the property and for the purpose of committing a crime as opportunity may be discovered.

(i) Who, while loitering, prowling, or wandering upon the private
 property of another, at any time, peeks in the door or window of an inhabited building or structure, without visible or lawful business with the owner or occupant.

(j) (1) A person who looks through a hole or opening, into, or otherwise views, by means of any instrumentality, including, but not limited to, a periscope, telescope, binoculars, camera, motion picture camera, camcorder, mobile phone, electronic device, or unmanned aircraft system, the interior of a bedroom, bathroom, changing room, fitting room, dressing room, or tanning booth, or the interior of any other area in which the occupant has a reasonable expectation of privacy, with the intent to invade the privacy of a person or persons inside. This subdivision does not apply to those areas of a private business used to count currency or other negotiable instruments.

(2) A person who uses a concealed
 camcorder, motion picture camera, or photographic camera of any type, to secretly videotape, film, photograph, or record by electronic means, another identifiable person under or through the clothing being worn by that other person, for the purpose of viewing the body of, or the undergarments worn by, that other person, without the consent or knowledge of that other person, with the intent to arouse, appeal to, or gratify the lust, passions, or sexual desires of that person and invade the privacy of that other person, under circumstances in which the other person has a reasonable expectation of privacy. For the purposes of this paragraph, “identifiable” means capable of identification, or capable of being recognized, meaning that someone, including the victim, could identify or recognize the victim. It does not require the victim’s identity to actually be established.

(3) (A) A person who uses a concealed camcorder, motion
 picture camera, or photographic camera of any type, to secretly videotape, film, photograph, or record by electronic means, another identifiable person who may be in a state of full or partial undress, for the purpose of viewing the body of, or the undergarments worn by, that other person, without the consent or knowledge of that other person, in the interior of a bedroom, bathroom, changing room, fitting room, dressing room, or tanning booth, or the interior of any other area in which that other person has a reasonable expectation of privacy, with the intent to invade the privacy of that other person. For the purposes of this paragraph, “identifiable” means capable of identification, or capable of being recognized, meaning that someone, including the victim, could identify or recognize the victim. It does not require the victim’s identity to actually be established.

(B) Neither of the following is a defense to the crime specified in this
 paragraph:

(i) The defendant was a cohabitant, landlord, tenant, cotenant, employer, employee, or business partner or associate of the victim, or an agent of any of these.

(ii) The victim was not in a state of full or partial undress.

(4) (A) (i) A person who intentionally distributes or causes to be distributed the image of the intimate body part or parts of another identifiable person, or an image of the person depicted engaged in an act of sexual intercourse, sodomy, oral copulation, sexual penetration, or an image of masturbation by the person depicted or in which the person depicted participates, when subclauses (I) to (III), inclusive, are all true:

(I) The person distributing the image knows or should
 know that the distribution of the image will cause serious emotional distress.

(II) The person depicted suffers serious emotional distress.

(III) One of the following has occurred:

(ia) The person depicted in the image and the person distributing the image had agreed or had an understanding that the image shall remain private.

(ib) The image was knowingly recorded, captured, or otherwise obtained by the person distributing the image without the authorization of the person depicted, and the image was recorded or captured under circumstances in which the person depicted had a reasonable expectation of privacy.

(ic) The image is knowingly obtained by the person distributing the image by
 exceeding authorized access from the property, accounts, messages, files, or resources of the person depicted.

(ii) A person who intentionally creates and distributes or causes to be distributed any photo realistic image, digital image, electronic image, computer image, computer-generated image, or other pictorial representation of an intimate body part or parts of another identifiable person, or an image of the person depicted engaged in an act of sexual intercourse, sodomy, oral copulation, sexual penetration, or an image of masturbation by the person depicted or in which the person depicted participates that was created in a manner that would cause a reasonable person to believe the image is an authentic image of the person depicted, under circumstances in which the person distributing the image knows or should know that distribution of the image will cause serious emotional distress, and the person depicted suffers that distress. This
 clause shall not apply to a person who was under 18 years of age at the time the person committed the offense.

(B) (i) A person intentionally distributes an image described in subparagraph (A) when that person personally distributes the image.

(ii) A person intentionally causes an image described in subparagraph (A) to be distributed when that person arranges, specifically requests, or intentionally causes another person to distribute the image.

(C) As used in this paragraph, the following terms have the following meanings:

(i) “Distribute” includes exhibiting in public or giving possession.

(ii) “Identifiable” has the same meaning as in paragraphs (2) and (3).

(iii) “Intimate body part” means any portion of the genitals, the anus and, in the case of a female, also includes any portion of the breasts below the top of the areola, that is either uncovered or clearly visible through clothing.

(D) It shall not be a violation of this paragraph to distribute an image described in subparagraph (A) if any of the following applies:

(i) The distribution is made in the course of reporting an unlawful activity.

(ii) The distribution is made in compliance with a subpoena or other court order for use in a legal proceeding.

(iii) The distribution is made in the course of a lawful public proceeding.

(iv) The distribution is related to a matter of public concern or public interest. Distribution is not a matter of public concern or public interest solely because the depicted individual is a public figure.

(5) This subdivision does not preclude punishment under any section of law providing for greater punishment.

(6) A defendant shall not be punished for both a violation of paragraph (4) of subdivision (j) and paragraph (2) of subdivision (j) or Section 502 if that punishment would be barred under Section 654.

(k) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (3), a second or subsequent violation of subdivision (j) is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by a fine not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3), if the victim of a violation of subdivision (j) was a minor at the time of the offense, the violation is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by a fine not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(3) If the victim of a violation of paragraph (3) of subdivision (j) was a minor at the time of the offense, a second or subsequent violation of paragraph (3) of subdivision (j) is punishable by a fine not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by imprisonment in county jail not exceeding one year, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by both a fine and imprisonment. This paragraph shall not apply to a person who was under 18 years of age at the time that they committed the offense.

(l) (1) (A) If a crime is committed in violation of subdivision (b) by a defendant who is 18 years of age or older, the person who was solicited was a minor at the time of the offense, and the defendant knew or should have known that the person who was solicited was a minor at the time of the offense, the violation is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for not less than two days and not more than one year, or by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment, except as provided in paragraph (2).

(B) The court may, in unusual cases, when the interests of justice are best served, reduce or eliminate the mandatory two days of imprisonment in a county jail required by this paragraph. If the court reduces or eliminates the mandatory two days of imprisonment, the court shall specify the reason on the record.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a defendant 18 years of age or older may be punished by either imprisonment in a county jail for not less than two days and not more than one year, or by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment, or imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for any of the following:

(A) The solicited minor was under 16 years of age at the time of the offense, or the person solicited was under 18 years of age at the time of the offense and the person solicited was caused, induced, or persuaded at the time of the solicitation to engage in a commercial sex act as specified in subdivision (c) of Section 236.1.

(B) The solicited minor was more than 3 years younger than the defendant at the time of the offense.

(3) A second or subsequent violation of paragraph (2) is punishable as a felony by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(4) A defendant who is convicted of a violation of paragraph (2) shall be ordered by the court, if granted probation, to successfully complete an education program on human trafficking and the exploitation of children. A fee shall not be imposed for participation or enrollment in an education program pursuant to this paragraph.

(5) An individual who provides compensation, money, or anything of value in violation of paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (b) shall, in addition to any other punishment, be punished by a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000). Fines collected pursuant to this paragraph shall be deposited in the Survivors Support
 Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 82, Sec. 4.   (AB 379)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

647.1.

In addition to any fine assessed under Section 647, the judge may assess a fine not to exceed seventy dollars ($70) against any person who violates subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 647, or, if the offense involves intravenous use of a controlled substance, subdivision (f) of Section 647, with the proceeds of this fine to be used in accordance with Section 1463.23.

The court shall, however, take into consideration the defendant’s ability to pay and no defendant shall be denied probation because of his or her inability to pay the fine permitted under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1243, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

647.2.

If a person is convicted of a violation of subdivision (f) of Section 647 and is granted probation, the court may order, with the consent of the defendant, as a term and condition of probation, in addition to any other term and condition required or authorized by law, that the defendant participate in the program prescribed in Section 23509 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 118, Sec. 1.21.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 85 of Ch. 118.)
-------------------------------------------

647.3.

(a) A person who reports being a victim of, or a witness to, a serious felony as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7, an assault in violation of subdivision (a) of Section 245, domestic violence in violation of Section 273.5, extortion in violation of Section 518, human trafficking in violation of Section 236.1, sexual battery in violation of subdivision (a) of Section 243.4, or stalking in violation of Section 646.9 shall not be arrested for any of the following offenses if that offense is related to the crime that the person is reporting or if the person was engaged in that offense at or around the time that the person was the victim of or witness to the crime they are reporting:

(1) A
 misdemeanor violation of the California Uniform Controlled Substances Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code).

(2) A violation of Section 372 or subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 647, or former Section 653.22, if the offense is related to an act of prostitution.

(b) Possession of condoms in any amount shall not provide a basis for probable cause for arrest for a violation of Section 372 or subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 647, or former Section 653.22 if the offense is related to an act of prostitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 86, Sec. 2.   (SB 357)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

647.5.

(a) The California Victim Compensation Board shall establish a grant program to provide grants to community-based organizations that provide direct services and outreach to victims of sex trafficking and exploitation.

(b) The board shall, in a manner determined by the board, award grants described in subdivision (a) to community-based organizations that are led by survivors of sex trafficking or that are guided by substantial survivor input and that provide direct services to vulnerable individuals in areas with a high concentration of sex trafficking.

(c) The Survivor Support Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury. Moneys in the Survivor Support Fund shall, upon
 appropriation by the Legislature, be available for the grants provided pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 82, Sec. 5.   (AB 379)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

647.6.

(a) (1) Every person who annoys or molests any child under 18 years of age shall be punished by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(2) Every person who, motivated by an unnatural or abnormal sexual interest in children, engages in conduct with an adult whom he or she believes to be a child under 18 years of age, which conduct, if directed toward a child under 18 years of age, would be a violation of this section, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), by imprisonment in a county jail for up to one year, or by both that
 fine and imprisonment.

(b) Every person who violates this section after having entered, without consent, an inhabited dwelling house, or trailer coach as defined in Section 635 of the Vehicle Code, or the inhabited portion of any other building, shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison, or in a county jail not exceeding one year, and by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(c) (1) Every person who violates this section shall be punished upon the second and each subsequent conviction by imprisonment in the state prison.

(2) Every person who violates this section after a previous felony conviction under Section 261, 264.1, 269, 285, 286, 287, 288.5,
 or 289, or former Section 288a, any of which involved a minor under 16 years of age, or a previous felony conviction under this section, a conviction under Section 288, or a felony conviction under Section 311.4 involving a minor under 14 years of age shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for two, four, or six years.

(d) (1) In any case in which a person is convicted of violating this section and probation is granted, the court shall require counseling as a condition of probation, unless the court makes a written statement in the court record, that counseling would be inappropriate or ineffective.

(2) In any case in which a person is convicted of violating this section, and as a condition of
 probation, the court prohibits the defendant from having contact with the victim, the court order prohibiting contact shall not be modified except upon the request of the victim and a finding by the court that the modification is in the best interest of the victim. As used in this paragraph, “contact with the victim” includes all physical contact, being in the presence of the victim, communication by any means, any communication by a third party acting on behalf of the defendant, and any gifts.

(e) Nothing in this section prohibits prosecution under any other provision of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 423, Sec. 63.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

647.7.

(a) In any case in which a person is convicted of violating subdivision (i) or (j) of Section 647, the court may require counseling as a condition of probation. Any defendant so ordered to be placed in a counseling program shall be responsible for paying the expense of his or her participation in the counseling program as determined by the court. The court shall take into consideration the ability of the defendant to pay, and no defendant shall be denied probation because of his or her inability to pay.

(b) Every person who, having been convicted of violating subdivision (i) or (j) of Section 647, commits a second or subsequent violation of subdivision (i) or (j) of Section 647,
 shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment, except as provided in subdivision (c).

(c) Every person who, having been previously convicted of violating subdivision (i) or (j) of Section 647, commits a violation of paragraph (3) of subdivision (j) of Section 647 regardless of whether it is a first, second, or subsequent violation of that paragraph, shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 209.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

647.8.

(a) Matter that is obtained or distributed in violation of subdivision (j) of Section 647 and that is in the possession of any city, county, city and county, or state official or agency is subject to forfeiture pursuant to this section.

(b) An action to forfeit matter described in subdivision (a) may be brought by the Attorney General, the district attorney, county counsel, or the city attorney. Proceedings shall be initiated by a petition of forfeiture filed in the superior court of the county in which the matter is located.

(c) The prosecuting agency shall make service of process of a notice regarding that petition upon every individual